Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 1. Prohibited Acts.

Collateral references. —

James F. Mosher, Liquor Liability Law (Matthew Bender).

Sec. 04.16.010.
Hours of sale and presence on licensed premises (standard closing hours).

A person may not sell, offer for sale, give, furnish, deliver, or consume an alcoholic beverage on premises licensed under this title between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not permit a person to consume alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not permit a person to enter and a person may not enter premises licensed under this title between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day. This subsection does not apply to common carriers or to an employee of the licensee who is on the premises to prepare for the next day’s business. A person may enter or remain on the premises of a bona fide restaurant or eating place licensed under this title to consume food or nonalcoholic beverages.

A municipality may provide for additional hours of closure under AS

04.21.010

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For restaurant designation permits, see 13 AAC 104, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, § 308.

Validity of municipal regulation more restrictive that state regulation as to time for selling or serving intoxicating liquor. 51 ALR3d 1061.

Validity, construction, and effect of “Sunday closing” or “blue” laws — modern status. 10 ALR4th 246.

Validity, under federal and state establishment of religion provisions, of prohibition of sale of intoxicating liquors on specific religious holidays. 27 ALR4th 1155.

Sec. 04.16.010.
Hours of sale and presence on licensed premises (standard closing hours).

A person may not sell, offer for sale, give, furnish, deliver, or consume an alcoholic beverage on premises licensed under this title between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not permit a person to consume alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a licensee, an agent, or an employee may not permit a person to enter and a person may not enter premises licensed under this title between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 8:00 a.m. each day, unless the person is

on the premises to conduct business with the licensee, agent, or employee, and the licensee, agent, or employee is in compliance with (a) and (b) of this section;

a common carrier with a common carrier dispensary license under AS

04.09.260

;

an employee of the licensee who is on the premises to prepare for the next day’s business;

performing maintenance or improvements authorized by the licensee; or

on the premises to consume food or nonalcoholic beverages and the premises are

licensed under a restaurant or eating place license issued under AS

04.09.210

or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license issued under AS

04.09.360

; or

covered under a restaurant endorsement issued under AS

04.09.450

.

A municipality may provide for additional hours of closure under AS

04.21.010

.

A brewery, winery, or distillery retail licensee or an agent or employee of a brewery, winery, or distillery retail licensee may not permit a person to enter or remain on and a person may not enter or remain on a premises licensed under this title between the hours of 9:30 p.m. and 9:00 a.m. each day, unless the person is

on the premises to conduct business with the licensee, agent, or employee, and the licensee, agent, or employee is in compliance with (a) and (b) of this section;

an employee of the licensee who is on the premises to prepare for the next day’s business; or

performing maintenance or improvements authorized by the licensee.

A person who violates (a), (b), (c), or (e) of this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 85, 86 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.015.
Pricing and marketing of alcoholic beverages.

On premises where alcoholic beverages are sold by the drink, a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee may not

offer or deliver, as a marketing device to the general public, free alcoholic beverages to a patron;

deliver an alcoholic beverage to a person already possessing two or more;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons at a price less than the price regularly charged for the beverages during the same calendar week, except at private functions not open to the general public;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver an unlimited number of alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons during a set period of time for a fixed price;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons on any one day at prices less than those charged the general public on that day, except at private functions not open to the general public;

encourage or permit an organized game or contest on the licensed premises that involves drinking alcoholic beverages or the awarding of alcoholic beverages as prizes.

A licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee may not advertise or promote in any way, either on or off the premises, a practice prohibited under (a) of this section.

This section may not be construed as prohibiting a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee from offering free food or entertainment at any time, from serving wine by the bottle or carafe or beer by the pitcher with or without meals, or from including an alcoholic beverage as part of a meal package.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee when acting as a caterer may offer or deliver free alcoholic beverages to a political, charitable, or educational group or organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

State power to regulate price of intoxicating liquors. 14 ALR2d 699.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring or prohibiting posting or other publication of price by liquor dealer.
80 ALR3d 740.

Validity of state statute or regulation fixing minimum prices at which alcoholic beverages may be sold at retail. 96 ALR3d 639.

Validity, construction, and effect of “Sunday closing” or “blue” laws — modern status. 10 ALR4th 246.

Sec. 04.16.015.
Pricing and marketing of alcoholic beverages.

On premises where alcoholic beverages are sold by the drink, a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee may not

offer or deliver, as a marketing device to the general public, free alcoholic beverages to a patron, except as provided for the holder of a manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS

04.09.410

or a package store sampling endorsement under AS

04.09.490

;

deliver an alcoholic beverage to a person already possessing two or more;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons at a price less than the price regularly charged for the beverages during a consecutive seven-day period, except at private functions not open to the general public;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver an unlimited number of alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons during a set period of time for a fixed price;

sell, offer to sell, or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person or group of persons on any one day at prices less than those charged the general public on that day, except at private functions not open to the general public;

encourage or permit an organized game or contest on the licensed premises that involves drinking alcoholic beverages or the awarding of alcoholic beverages as prizes.

A licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee may not advertise or promote in any way, either on or off the premises, a practice prohibited under (a) of this section.

This section may not be construed as prohibiting a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee from offering free food or entertainment at any time, from serving wine by the bottle or carafe or beer by the pitcher with or without meals, or from including an alcoholic beverage as part of a meal package.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, a licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee when acting as a caterer may offer or deliver free alcoholic beverages to a political, charitable, or educational group or organization.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1986; am §§ 87, 88 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.017.
Trade practices.

A person holding a license under AS

04.09.020

,

04.09.030

,

04.09.040

,

04.09.100

, or

04.09.110

or engaged in the alcoholic beverage industry in another state or country as a brewer, vintner, distiller, or importer, or as an agent of a brewer, vintner, distiller, or importer, may not, except as provided in regulations adopted by the board under (b) of this section, induce a person holding a license under this title to

operate as a tied house by inducing a retailer engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages to purchase products from an entity to the exclusion, in whole or in part, of products sold or offered for sale by other entities by

furnishing, giving, renting, lending, or selling to the retailer equipment fixtures, signs, supplies, money, services, or other things of value, except those excluded in regulation and determined to be not contrary to the public interest or contrary to the intent of this subsection;

paying or crediting the retailer for an advertising, display, or distribution service;

guaranteeing a loan or the repayment of a financial obligation of the retailer;

extending to the retailer credit for a period in excess of the credit period usual and customary to the industry for the particular class of transactions; or

requiring the retailer to take and dispose of a certain quota of the products;

operate as an exclusive outlet by requiring that a retailer engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages purchase products from an entity to the exclusion, in whole or in part, of alcoholic beverages sold or offered for sale by other entities;

purchase products from an entity to the exclusion, in whole or in part, of products sold or offered for sale by other entities by

commercial bribery; or

offering or giving any bonus, premium, or compensation to an officer, employee, or representative of the licensee;

enter into an agreement for consignment sales, or to purchase, offer to purchase, or contract to purchase products on consignment, under conditional sale, or with the privilege of return on any basis other than a bona fide sale, or where part of the transaction involves, directly or indirectly, the acquisition by an entity from the licensee, or the entity’s agreement to acquire from the licensee, other alcoholic beverages, except that this paragraph does not apply to transactions involving solely the return of merchandise for ordinary and usual commercial reasons arising after the merchandise has been sold.

The board shall adopt regulations providing exceptions to the practices listed under (a) of this section that are

consistent with federal law at the time of the effective date of this section;

necessary to avoid practical difficulty or undue hardship on a licensee;

in the best interests of the public; and

consistent with the requirements of this title.

The board shall adopt regulations establishing administrative penalties for a violation of this section.

In this section, “commercial bribery,” “consignment sales,” “exclusive outlet,” and “tied house” have the meanings given in 27 U.S.C. 205 and regulations adopted under that section.

History.

(§ 89 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.020.
Solicitation of alcoholic beverages; purchase on behalf of another.

A person may not pay or receive from another a salary, percentage, or commission to solicit or encourage a patron of licensed premises to purchase alcoholic or other beverages for a person other than the patron.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not knowingly permit a person to loiter within or about premises licensed under this title for the purpose of begging or soliciting a patron or visitor to purchase alcoholic or other beverages for the person who is begging or soliciting.

A person may not purchase alcohol by written order on behalf of another person who resides in a municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

or (b)(4).

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.16.020.
Solicitation of alcoholic beverages; purchase on behalf of another.

A person may not pay or receive from another a salary, percentage, or commission to solicit or encourage a patron of licensed premises to purchase alcoholic or other beverages for a person other than the patron.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not knowingly permit a person to loiter within or about premises licensed under this title for the purpose of begging or soliciting a patron or visitor to purchase alcoholic or other beverages for the person who is begging or soliciting.

A person may not purchase alcohol by written order on behalf of another person who resides in a municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

or (b)(4).

A person who violates a provision of this section commits the offense of unauthorized solicitation or purchase of alcoholic beverages.

Unauthorized solicitation or purchase of alcoholic beverages is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $100.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 90 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.022.
Online sale and purchase of alcoholic beverages.

A licensee or a licensee’s agent or employee may not sell or offer to sell alcoholic beverages to the public online unless the licensee holds a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

or a package store shipping endorsement under AS

04.09.460

.

A person may not purchase alcoholic beverages online except from the holder of a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

or a package store shipping endorsement under AS

04.09.460

.

A person who violates (a) of this section is, upon conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates (b) of this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 91 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.025.
Illegal presence on premises involving alcoholic beverages.

A person may not knowingly enter or remain on premises

in which alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale or barter, trafficked in, or bartered in violation of

AS

04.11.010

; or

a municipal ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010(a)

or (b); or

licensed under this title during hours in which the person’s presence on the premises is a violation of a municipal ordinance adopted under authority of AS

04.16.010(d)

providing for hours of closure that are outside the hours of closure prescribed by AS

04.16.010(c)

.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 31 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.16.025.
Illegal presence on premises involving alcoholic beverages.

A person may not knowingly enter or remain on premises

in which alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, offered for sale, possessed for sale or barter, trafficked in, or bartered in violation of

AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, or AS

04.11.010

; or

a municipal ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010(a)

or (b); or

licensed under this title during hours in which the person’s presence on the premises is a violation of a municipal ordinance adopted under authority of AS

04.16.010(d)

providing for hours of closure that are outside the hours of closure prescribed by AS

04.16.010(c)

or (e).

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 31 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 92 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.030.
Prohibited conduct relating to drunken persons.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not with criminal negligence

sell, give, or barter alcoholic beverages to a drunken person;

allow another person to sell, give, or barter an alcoholic beverage to a drunken person within licensed premises;

allow a drunken person to enter and remain within licensed premises or to consume an alcoholic beverage within licensed premises;

permit a drunken person to sell or serve alcoholic beverages.

A person receiving compensation for transporting alcoholic beverages may not knowingly deliver alcoholic beverages to a drunken person.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 156 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For authorization to refuse service, see AS

04.21.055

.

Sec. 04.16.030.
Prohibited conduct relating to drunken persons.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not with criminal negligence

sell, give, or barter alcoholic beverages to a drunken person;

allow another person to sell, give, or barter an alcoholic beverage to a drunken person within licensed premises;

allow a drunken person to enter and remain within licensed premises or to consume an alcoholic beverage within licensed premises;

permit a drunken person to sell or serve alcoholic beverages.

A person receiving compensation for transporting alcoholic beverages may not knowingly deliver alcoholic beverages to a drunken person.

A person who violates this section commits the offense of prohibited conduct relating to a drunken person.

Prohibited conduct relating to a drunken person is a violation, punishable by a fine of $500.

The holder of a license is strictly and vicariously liable for an offense committed under (c) of this section by an employee or agent of the licensee on the licensed premises, punishable by an administrative penalty of $250. Notwithstanding AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

and (5) and AS

04.16.180(b)(1)

, the board may not order suspension of the license for the first violation committed on the licensed premises under this section.

A licensee who knowingly allows an agent or employee of the licensee to commit the offense of prohibited conduct relating to a drunken person under (c) of this section commits the crime of failure to ensure compliance relating to a drunken person.

Failure to ensure compliance relating to a drunken person is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 93 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.035.
Possession of ingredients for homebrew in certain areas.

A person residing in an area that has adopted a local option to prohibit the sale, importation, and possession of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

or (b)(4) may not possess sugar, artificial sugar, malt, yeast, or any other material or equipment with the intent to use the material or equipment to create an alcoholic beverage.

History.

(§ 12 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.16.035.
Possession of ingredients for homebrew in certain areas.

A person residing in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

may not possess sugar, artificial sugar, malt, yeast, or any other material or equipment with the intent to use the material or equipment to create an alcoholic beverage.

A person who knowingly violates this section commits the crime of possession of ingredients for homebrew.

Possession of ingredients for homebrew is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 12 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 94 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 95 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.040.
Access of drunken persons to licensed premises.

A drunken person may not knowingly enter or remain on premises licensed under this title.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.040.
Access of drunken persons to licensed premises.

A drunken person may not knowingly enter or remain on premises licensed under this title.

A person who violates this section commits the offense of prohibited access by a drunken person.

Prohibited access by a drunken person is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 96 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.045.
Obligation to enforce restrictions in licensed premises.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages by any person within licensed premises unless it is permitted by the license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 04.16.041.
Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For responsibility of licensee for violations, see AS

04.16.150

.

Sec. 04.16.045.
Obligation to enforce restrictions in licensed premises.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may not permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages by any person within licensed premises unless it is permitted by the license.

A person who violates this section commits the offense of permitting consumption not authorized under a license.

Permitting consumption not authorized under a license is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 97 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.047.
Access of persons with restriction on purchasing alcohol.

A person who is restricted from purchasing alcohol under AS

04.16.160

may not knowingly enter or remain in premises licensed under this title to obtain or consume alcohol.

A licensee may bring a civil action against a person who violates this section if the violation occurs on the premises of that licensee. If judgment is entered in favor of the licensee, the court shall award civil damages in the amount of $1,000 and award reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees allowed under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section or AS

04.16.160

creates a duty or imposes an obligation on a licensee to physically check the identification of any person entering licensed premises.

History.

(§ 1 ch 24 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.16.047.
Access of persons with restriction on purchasing alcohol.

A person who is restricted from purchasing alcohol under AS

04.16.160

may not knowingly enter or remain in premises licensed under this title to obtain or consume alcohol.

A licensee may bring a civil action against a person who violates this section if the violation occurs on the premises of that licensee. If judgment is entered in favor of the licensee, the court shall award civil damages in the amount of $1,000 and award reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees allowed under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section or AS

04.16.160

creates a duty or imposes an obligation on a licensee to physically check the identification of any person entering licensed premises.

A person who is restricted from purchasing alcohol under AS

04.16.160

who knowingly violates (a) of this section commits the crime of entering or remaining on licensed premises.

Entering or remaining on licensed premises is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 98 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.049.
Access of persons under the age of 21 to licensed premises.

A person under 21 years of age may not knowingly enter or remain in premises licensed under this title unless

accompanied by a parent, guardian, or spouse who has attained 21 years of age;

the person is at least 16 years of age, the premises are designated by the board as a restaurant for the purposes of this section, and the person enters and remains only for dining;

the person is under 16 years of age, is accompanied by a person over 21 years of age, the parent or guardian of the underaged person consents, the premises are designated by the board as a restaurant for the purposes of this section, and the person enters and remains only for dining;

the person is permitted on the premises under a club license issued under AS

04.11.110(g)

; or

otherwise provided under (c), (d), or (g) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee may refuse entry to a person under 21 years of age to that part of licensed premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, or consumed, may refuse service to a person under 21 years of age, or may require a person under 21 years of age to leave the portion of the licensed premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, or consumed.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person 16 or 17 years of age may enter and remain within the licensed premises of a hotel, golf course, or restaurant or eating place in the course of employment if (1) the employment does not involve the serving, mixing, delivering, or dispensing of alcoholic beverages; (2) the person has the written consent of a parent or guardian; and (3) an exemption from the prohibition of AS

23.10.355

is granted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. The board, with the approval of the governing body having jurisdiction and at the licensee’s request, shall designate which premises are hotels, golf courses, restaurants, or eating places for the purposes of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person 18, 19, or 20 years of age may be employed within the licensed premises of a hotel, golf course, or restaurant or eating place, may enter and remain within those premises for the purpose of employment, but may not, in the course of employment, sell, serve, deliver, or dispense alcoholic beverages.

A licensee may bring a civil action against a person who violates this section if the violation occurs on the premises of that licensee. If judgment is entered in favor of the licensee, the court shall award civil damages in the amount of $1,500 and award reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees allowed under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

A person under 21 years of age does not violate this section if the person enters or remains on premises licensed under this title at the request of a peace officer, if the peace officer accompanies, supervises, or otherwise observes the person’s entry or remaining on premises, and the purpose for the entry or remaining on premises is to assist in the enforcement of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person under 21 years of age may be present on licensed premises on a golf course for the purpose of playing golf or attending golf-related activities if the person

is at least 16 years of age; or

is under 16 years of age and

the person is accompanied by a person who is at least 21 years of age; and

a parent or guardian of the underaged person consents.

A person under 21 years of age who knowingly enters or remains on premises licensed under this title except as allowed in this section commits the offense of unauthorized presence by a person under 21 years of age on licensed premises.

Unauthorized presence by a person under 21 years of age on licensed premises is a violation, punishable by a fine of $500. The violation must be charged and filed with the court as a separate case and may not be combined or joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge in one action at the time of filing. A court may reduce the fine to $50 for a person who has not more than one previous violation or to $250 for a person who has two or more previous violations if the person provides the court, not later than six months after a judgment of conviction is entered, with proof of completion of

an alcohol safety action program or a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed, designated, or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37; or

a community diversion panel.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 28 SLA 1981; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 174 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 2014; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in subsection (c) in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For provisions allowing persons under 21 on premises with a club license during certain hours, see AS

04.11.110

.

Administrative Code. —

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

For restaurant designation permits, see 13 AAC 104, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, substituted “of age” for “the age of” in four places; in (a)(4), inserted “a club license issued under” preceding “AS

04.11.110(g)

” and “; or (5) otherwise provided under (c), (d), or (g) of this section” after said citation; in (b), substituted “of age” for “the age of” in three places; in (c), inserted “golf course, or” preceding “restaurant” and “golf courses” preceding “restaurants”; in (d), inserted “golf course, or” preceding “restaurant”; added (g); and made related changes.

Sec. 04.16.049.
Access of persons under the age of 21 to licensed premises.

A person under 21 years of age may not knowingly enter or remain in premises licensed under this title unless

accompanied by a parent, guardian, or spouse who has attained 21 years of age;

the person is allowed to enter and remain on the premises under a restaurant or eating place license issued underAS

04.09.210

, seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license issued under AS

04.09.360

, or restaurant endorsement issued under AS

04.09.450

the person is permitted on the premises under a club license issued under AS

04.09.220(g)

or former AS

04.11.110(g)

; or

otherwise provided under (c), (d), or (g) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee may refuse entry to a person under 21 years of age to that part of licensed premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, or consumed, may refuse service to a person under 21 years of age, or may require a person under 21 years of age to leave the portion of the licensed premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, or consumed.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person 16 or 17 years of age may enter and remain within the licensed premises of a hotel or motel, large resort, golf course, general wholesaler, limited brewed beverage and wine wholesaler, common carrier dispensary, outdoor recreation lodge, or restaurant in the course of employment if

the employment does not involve the serving, mixing, delivering, or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;

the person has the written consent of a parent or guardian; and

an exemption from the prohibition of AS

23.10.355

is granted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person 18, 19, or 20 years of age may be employed within the licensed premises of a hotel or motel, large resort, golf course, general wholesaler, limited brewed beverage and wine wholesaler, common carrier dispensary, outdoor recreation lodge, or restaurant, may enter and remain within those premises for the purpose of employment, but may not, in the course of employment, sell, serve, deliver, or dispense alcoholic beverages.

A licensee may bring a civil action against a person who violates this section if the violation occurs on the premises of that licensee. If judgment is entered in favor of the licensee, the court shall award civil damages in the amount of $1,500 and award reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees allowed under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

A person under 21 years of age does not violate this section if the person enters or remains on premises licensed under this title at the request of a peace officer, if the peace officer accompanies, supervises, or otherwise observes the person’s entry or remaining on premises, and the purpose for the entry or remaining on premises is to assist in the enforcement of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person under 21 years of age may be present on licensed premises on a golf course for the purpose of playing golf or attending golf-related activities if the person

is at least 16 years of age; or

is under 16 years of age and

the person is accompanied by a person who is at least 21 years of age; and

a parent or guardian of the underaged person consents.

A person under 21 years of age who knowingly enters or remains on premises licensed under this title except as allowed in this section commits the offense of unauthorized presence by a person under 21 years of age on licensed premises.

Unauthorized presence by a person under 21 years of age on licensed premises is a violation, punishable by a fine of $500. The violation must be charged and filed with the court as a separate case and may not be combined or joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge in one action at the time of filing. A court may reduce the fine to $50 for a person who has not more than one previous violation or to $250 for a person who has two or more previous violations if the person provides the court, not later than six months after a judgment of conviction is entered, with proof of completion of

an alcohol safety action program or a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed, designated, or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37; or

a community diversion panel.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person under 21 years of age may be present on the licensed premises of a common carrier dispensary, destination resort, or outdoor recreation lodge for the purpose of travel, travel lodging, or outdoor recreation activities provided by the licensee if the person is

at least 16 years of age; or

under 16 years of age and a parent or legal guardian of the underaged person consents.

;

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 28 SLA 1981; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 174 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 2014; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 99 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 100 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 101 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 102 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.050.
Possession, control, or consumption by persons under 21 years of age.

A person under 21 years of age may not knowingly consume, possess, or control alcoholic beverages except those furnished to persons under AS

04.16.051(b)

.

A person under 21 years of age who knowingly consumes, possesses, or controls an alcoholic beverage other than an alcoholic beverage furnished under AS

04.16.051(b)

commits the offense of minor consuming or in possession or control.

Minor consuming or in possession or control is a violation, punishable by a fine of $500. The violation must be charged and filed with the court as a separate case and may not be combined or joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge in one action at the time of filing. A court may reduce the fine to $50 for a person who has not more than one previous violation or to $250 for a person who has two or more previous violations if the person provides the court, not later than six months after a judgment of conviction is entered, with proof of completion of

an alcohol safety action program or a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed, designated, or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37; or

a community diversion panel.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 65 SLA 2001; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 86 SLA 2010; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 88 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, rewrote the section.

Administrative Code. —

For restaurant designation permits, see 13 AAC 104, art. 7.

Sec. 04.16.051.
Furnishing or delivery of alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21.

A person may not furnish or deliver an alcoholic beverage to a person under the age of 21 years. This subsection does not apply to a licensee or an agent or employee of a licensee while working on licensed premises.

This section does not prohibit the furnishing or delivery of an alcoholic beverage

by a parent to the parent’s child, by a guardian to the guardian’s ward, or by a person to the legal spouse of that person if the furnishing or delivery occurs off licensed premises; or

by a licensed physician or nurse to a patient in the course of administering medical treatment.

Acts unlawful under AS

11.51.130

are not made legal by (b) of this section.

A person acting with criminal negligence who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony if

within the five years preceding the violation, the person has been previously convicted under

this section; or

a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements substantially similar to this section;

the person who receives the alcoholic beverage negligently causes serious physical injury to or the death of another person while under the influence of the alcoholic beverage received in violation of this section; in this paragraph,

“negligently” means acting with civil negligence; and

“serious physical injury” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

; or

the violation occurs within the boundaries of a municipality or the perimeter of an established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

and has not opted out of applying a class C felony to violations of this section under AS

04.11.491(g)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 109 SLA 1983; am §§ 7, 8 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 90 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares that § 6, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (a) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 04.16.052.
Furnishing of alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21 by licensees.

A licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee may not with criminal negligence

allow another person to sell, barter, or give an alcoholic beverage to a person under the age of 21 years within licensed premises;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to enter and remain within licensed premises except as provided in AS

04.16.049

;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to consume an alcoholic beverage within licensed premises;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to sell or serve alcoholic beverages;

while working on licensed premises, furnish or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person under the age of 21 years.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares that § 7, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.